Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB342.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.1411 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For students entering grade nine (9) on or before June 30, 2025[Beginning with the entering ninth grade
class of the 2020-2021 school year and each year thereafter], successful completion of one (1) or more courses
or programs that meet the financial literacy standards shall be a Kentucky public high school graduation
requirement.[ The graduation requirement shall also apply to a student pursuing an early graduation program,
as established in KRS 158.142.]
(2) For students entering grade nine (9) on or after July 1, 2025, successful completion of a one (1) credit
course in financial literacy shall be a Kentucky public high school graduation requirement.
(3) The graduation requirement in subsections (1) and (2) shall also apply to a student pursuing an early
graduation program as established in KRS 158.142.
(4) The financial literacy course required by subsection (2) of this section shall align to the student's individual
learning plan and include but not be limited to instruction in the following areas:
(a) Budgeting;
(b) Saving and investing;
(c) Credit and debt;
(d) Insurance and risk management, including but not limited to personal insurance policies;
(e) Taxes; and
(f) The necessity of critical review and understanding of documents prior to signing agreement or
approval and the ability to provide a signature in cursive.
(5) The financial literacy course required by subsection (2) of this section shall be accepted as an elective
course requirement for high school graduation notwithstanding any other provisions of law.
(6) In accordance with KRS 156.160, the Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative
regulations establishing academic standards[ and a graduation requirement] for financial literacy.
(7)[(3)] The local superintendent, after consultation with the local board of education, school-based decision
making council, and[, or] principal[ if no council exists,] of each high school, shall determine curricula for
course offerings[, programs, or a combination of course offerings and programs] that are aligned with the
financial literacy academic standards promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Education.
(8)[(4)] The Department of Education shall develop financial literacy guidelines for local schools and districts.
(9) Local schools and districts may consult with the Kentucky Financial Empowerment Commission
established in KRS 41.450 when[that provide direction to local schools in] developing and implementing the
financial literacy standards.
(10) The Department of Education shall identify through the system for uniform academic course codes, which
courses meet the requirements for the financial literacy course required in subsection (2) of this section.
Signed by Governor March 24, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version